Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,124
Information; contents.

Such information shall consist of a plain statement of the facts which constitute the grounds of the proceeding, addressed to the court, which shall stand for an original complaint.

R.S.1867, Code § 707, p. 517;

R.S.1913, § 8331;

C.S.1922, § 9283;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,115;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,124;

Laws 2002, LB 876, § 47.

Quo warranto lies against one who is in possession or user of an office, or who has been admitted thereto. State ex rel. Good v. Marsh, 125 Neb. 125, 249 N.W. 295 (1933).

Petition sustained against claim of stating two separate and distinct causes of action. Duffy v. State ex rel. Edson, 60 Neb. 812, 84 N.W. 264 (1900).